Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-516
Sewer bonds; amount authorized; issuance.

The city council may issue annually bonds not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars, for the purpose of constructing main sewers, and to be denominated sewer bonds. Such bonds shall be issued in accordance with the provisions of section 14-515, and the proceeds therefrom shall not be used for any other purpose than to construct main sewers.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 15, p. 475;

C.S.1922, § 3639;

C.S.1929, § 14-516;

R.S.1943, § 14-516.